Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2319
Nurse practitioner; license; renewal; requirements.

To renew a license to practice as a nurse practitioner, the applicant shall have:

(1) Documentation of a minimum of two thousand eighty hours of practice as a nurse practitioner within the five years immediately preceding renewal. These practice hours shall fulfill the requirements of the practice hours required for registered nurse renewal. Practice hours as an advanced practice registered nurse prior to July 1, 2007, shall be used to fulfill the requirements of this section; and

(2) Proof of current certification in the specific nurse practitioner clinical specialty area by an approved certification program.

Laws 1981, LB 379, § 21;

Laws 1983, LB 472, § 6;

Laws 1984, LB 724, § 21;

Laws 1986, LB 926, § 56;

Laws 1988, LB 1100, § 105;

Laws 1993, LB 536, § 71;

Laws 1996, LB 414, § 36;

Laws 2000, LB 1115, § 52;

Laws 2002, LB 1021, § 58;

Laws 2003, LB 242, § 103;

Laws 2005, LB 256, § 65;

R.S.Supp.,2006, § 71-1724;

Laws 2007, LB185, § 10;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 811.